Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1190
Terms, defined.

For purposes
of sections 79-1189 to 79-1195:

(1)
Bridge program means a structured career pathway program, developed in partnership
among a provider of basic skills education and training, the provider of the
Adult Education Program established pursuant to section 79-11,133, and a nonprofit
social services organization, which assists students in obtaining academic,
employability, and technical skills needed to enter and succeed in postsecondary
education and training and the labor market; and

(2) Department
means the State Department of Education.

Laws 2012, LB1079, § 2.
June 30, 2015